Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-322
Right-of-way; obstruction in watercourses; condemnation; procedure.

The board of supervisors, in behalf of such district, shall have the right to acquire, and if need be, condemn in the same manner as is provided in section 31-321, any natural or artificial obstruction in any existing watercourse, and remove the same therefrom for the benefit of the district.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 12, p. 618;

R.S.1913, § 1817;

C.S.1922, § 1764;

C.S.1929, § 31-421;

R.S.1943, § 31-322;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 73, p. 480.

Act, as amended 1909, is constitutional, though it omits provisions for recovery of damages. Nemaha Valley Drainage Dist. No. 2 v. Marconnit, 90 Neb. 514, 134 N.W. 177 (1912).